Utah, session 2026, HB311.
Section 1. Section 53H-4-708 is enacted to read:53H-4-708. Election study.(1)The institute and the center shall conduct a study to determine:(a)the security risks of in-person voting versus voting by mail; and(b)the best practices for conducting and implementing a process where identification is presented and checked at a ballot drop box before a voter may deposit a ballot in the ballot drop box.(2)The portion of the study described in Subsection (1)(a) shall include:(a)a comparison between Utah and states that don't use voting by mail as the primary means of voting;(b)an analysis of potential and actual fraud in Utah, and in comparison to other states;(c)an analysis of the accuracy or inaccuracy of voter rolls using a vote by mail system versus in-person voting; and(d)an analysis of related issues raised in 2024-20, A Performance Audit of Utah's Election System: Strengthening Election Integrity.(3)The portion of the study described in Subsection (1)(b) shall include information, analysis, and recommendations regarding:(a)logistics;(b)wait times;(c)costs; and(d)ballot processing.(4)The institute and the center shall present the results of the study described in this section to the Government Operations Interim Committee at or before the October 2026 interim meeting.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.